Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. Shore Erosion Control.

§ 10.1-700.
Definition.

As used in this article, the term
“shore erosion”
means the process of destruction by the action of water, wind, or ice of the land bordering any body of water including all rivers and the tidal waters of the Commonwealth.

History.

1972, c. 855, § 21-11.17; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-701.
Duties of Department.

The Department shall have the duty to:

Coordinate shore erosion control programs of all state agencies and institutions to implement practical solutions to shoreline erosion problems; however, such coordination shall not restrict the statutory authority of the individual agencies having responsibilities relating to shore erosion control;

Secure the cooperation and assistance of the United States and any of its agencies to protect waterfront property from destructive shore erosion;

Evaluate the effectiveness and practicability of current shore erosion control programs; and

Explore all facets of the problems and alternative solutions to determine if other practical and economical methods and practices may be devised to control shore erosion.

History.

1972, c. 855, § 21-11.18; 1980, c. 368; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-702.
Shore Erosion Advisory Service.

The Department is authorized to assist in carrying out the coordination responsibility of shore erosion control programs as herein assigned, and to establish a Shoreline Erosion Advisory Service.

History.

1972, c. 855, § 21-11.19; 1980, c. 368; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-703.
Cooperation and coordination with Virginia Institute of Marine Science.

The Department shall cooperate and coordinate with the Virginia Institute of Marine Science of The College of William and Mary in Virginia for research, training and technical advice on erosion-related problems.

History.

1980, c. 368, § 21-11.20; 1988, c. 891.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “The College of William and Mary in Virginia” was substituted for “The College of William and Mary” in this section to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

§ 10.1-704.
Use of dredged material for beach nourishment; priority.

The beaches of the Commonwealth shall be given priority consideration as sites for the disposal of that portion of dredged material determined to be suitable for beach nourishment. The Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources shall have the responsibility of determining whether the dredged material is suitable for beach nourishment.

History.

1987, cc. 220, 231, § 21-11.16:1; 1988, c. 891; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 401.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 401, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “and Historic.”